Hawaii statutes.
[§334-143] Notice of hearing and service of
petition on respondent. The court shall set a time and date for hearing on
the petition, within ten days of the filing of the petition. The notice of
hearing and petition shall be served on the respondent. [L 2004, c 44, pt of
§20]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next